Tennessee, session 114, HB0913.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-18-101, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting instead:
(a)
(1) A civil action in which the complaint meets each of the following
criteria must be heard and determined by a three-judge panel pursuant to this
chapter:
(A) Challenges the constitutionality of:
(i) A state statute, including a statute that apportions or
redistricts state legislative or congressional districts;
(ii) An executive order; or
(iii) An administrative rule or regulation;
(B) Includes a claim for declaratory judgment or injunctive relief;
and
(C) Is brought against the state, a state department or agency, or
a state official acting in their official capacity.
(2) A civil action in which it is alleged that a proposed charter amendment
ordinance that is to be submitted to qualified voters at an election is in violation of
the Constitution or state law must be heard and determined by a three-judge
panel pursuant to this chapter.
HB0913
000888
- 1 -

SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-53-105, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
(d) An amendment to the charter of a home rule municipality shall not be placed
on any ballot if the amendment is in violation of the Constitution or state law.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000888